Utah statutes.
63C-6-101.   Creation of commission -- Membership -- Appointment --
Vacancies.
(1)  There is created the Utah Seismic Safety Commission consisting of 15
members, designated as follows:
(a)  the director of the Division of Homeland Security or his designee;
(b)  the director of the Utah Geological Survey or his designee;
(c)  the director of the University of Utah Seismograph Stations or his
designee;
(d)  the executive director of the Utah League of Cities and Towns or his
designee;
(e)  a representative from the Structural Engineers Association of Utah
biannually selected by its membership;
(f)  the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management or
his designee;
(g)  the executive director of the Department of Transportation or his
designee;
(h)  the State Planning Coordinator or his designee;
(i)  a representative from the American Institute of Architects, Utah Section;
(j)  a representative from the American Society of Civil Engineers, Utah
Section;
(k)  a member of the House of Representatives appointed biannually by the
speaker of the House;
(l)  a member of the Senate appointed biannually by the president of the
Senate;
(m)  the commissioner of the Department of Insurance or his designee;
(n)  a representative from the Association of Contingency Planners, Utah
Chapter, biannually selected by its membership; and
(o)  a representative from the American Public Works Association, Utah
Chapter, biannually selected by its membership.
(2)  The commission shall annually select one of its members to serve as chair
of the commission.
(3)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
